Missouri, session 2026, SB1147.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1553, to read as
follows:
376.1553. 1. As used in this section, terms shall
have the same meanings as ascribed to them in section
376.1350; and the term "cost-sharing" shall include any co-
payment, coinsurance, deductible, amount paid by an enrollee
for health care services in excess of a coverage limitation,
or similar charge required by or on behalf of an enrollee in
order to receive a specific health care service covered by a
health benefit plan.
2. If an enrollee is admitted to a hospital emergency
room with a behavioral or mental health condition and the
hospital is not a participating provider for that condition
under the enrollee's health benefit plan, or if the enrollee
is transferred to another hospital that is not a
participating provider for that condition under the
patient's health benefit plan:
(1) The health carrier shall not impose cost-sharing
requirements for treatment of the behavioral or mental

SB 1147 2
health condition that are greater than the cost-sharing
requirements would be for treatment of the behavioral or
mental health condition by a participating provider; and
(2) The health carrier shall reimburse the hospital
for treatment of the behavioral or mental health condition
at the same rate the hospital would be reimbursed by MO
HealthNet or Medicare, whichever is greater.
3. It shall constitute an unlawful practice within the
meaning of section 407.020, and any action authorized in
sections 407.010 to 407.130 may be taken, if a health
benefit plan's provider network for treatment of behavioral
or mental health conditions is so inadequate that it
threatens the life of its enrollees. It shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the health benefit plan's
provider network is so inadequate that it threatens the life
of its enrollees if more than fifteen percent of its
enrollees treated for a behavioral or mental health
condition are treated for the condition outside of the
health benefit plan's provider network.
✓